Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201815-404
Ordinances; enactment; amendment; procedure.

All ordinances, resolutions, or orders for the appropriation or payment of money in a city of the primary class shall require for passage or adoption the concurrence of a majority of the members elected to the city council. Ordinances of a general or permanent nature shall be read by title on three different days unless the city council votes to suspend this requirement by a two-thirds vote of the members, except that such requirement shall not be suspended for any ordinance for the annexation of territory or the redrawing of boundaries for city council election districts or wards. No ordinance shall contain a subject which is not clearly expressed in its title. No ordinance or section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the new ordinance contains the entire ordinance or section as revised or amended, and the ordinance or section so amended shall be repealed.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 73, p. 96;

R.S.1913, § 4513;

C.S.1922, § 3899;

C.S.1929, § 15-404;

R.S.1943, § 15-404;

Laws 2018, LB865, § 2.

When no vote was taken to dispense with further reading of ordinance after being amended, fact that it passed by more than two-thirds vote of members was substantial compliance. Miller v. City of Lincoln, 94 Neb. 577, 143 N.W. 921 (1913).